Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7433.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 12-5 of the General Laws entitled "Search Warrants" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
12-5-11. Audio and video recording of private property prohibited.
(a) It shall be unlawful for any law enforcement officer or peace officer as defined in § 12-
7-21, to place on the private property of another, any audio or video recording device(s) to capture,
generate, preserve, transmit or otherwise document the activities on that person’s property without
their consent or without a valid search warrant issued by a neutral and detached magistrate or judge
upon a finding of probable cause.
(b) Any audio or video evidence generated in violation of subsection (a) of this section
shall be inadmissible in any criminal or civil proceeding filed against the property owner and/or
their tenants or guests.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004521
========